Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 4. General Provisions

Cross references. —

As to adoption, see chapter 22 of title 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 4, directs that a proceeding to adjudicate parentage under W.S.

14-2-401

et seq. which was commenced prior to July 1, 2003 is to be governed by the law in effect at the time the proceeding was commenced.

Editor's note. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Illegitimacy proceedings statutorily based. —

Illegitimacy or filiation proceedings are purely creation of statute since in common law an illegitimate child is considered the child of no one. Vigil v. Tafoya, 600 P.2d 721,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1979).

Chapter only statutory authority for determination of paternity.—

There is no common-law authority for the determination of paternity, and in this jurisdiction the only statutory authority therefor is found in this chapter. Blanton v. Warn, 444 P.2d 325,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1968).

Provisions authorizing parentage proceedings to be carefullyandstrictly followed. —

Since common law gave a putative father no right of action but this article does give him a cause of action which permits him to establish the parent-child relationship, the sections which authorize the proceedings in such matters must be carefully and strictly followed in order to give effect to the intention of the legislature. In re TRG, 665 P.2d 491,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1983).

Parties. —

An agency cannot bring an action and then claim it is not a party. Department of family services (DFS) initiated the action, participated and exercised control over the proceedings, and was a real party in interest who stood to benefit from identifying the father; just because DFS was required by statute to bring this action is irrelevant to whether the agency is a party. Department of Family Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs. v. DDM, 877 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1994).

Paternity determinations made in divorce actions not subjectto provisions. —

The rules under this article do not apply where paternity of a child presumed to be a child of the marriage is determined by consent of the parties in a proceeding to modify a divorce decree to include a child conceived during the marriage but born afterward. CSP v. DDC, 842 P.2d 528,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1992).

Termination of parental rights in adoption proceedings. —

In an adoption proceeding, the provisions regarding termination of parental rights found in the adoption statutes (§

1-22-101

et seq.) control over the more general provisions for the termination of parental rights found in this article. GWJ v. MH (In re BGH), 930 P.2d 371,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

41 Am. Jur. 2d Illegitimate Children § 1 et seq.

Mother's right to custody of illegitimate child, 98 ALR2d 417.

Right of putative father to visit illegitimate child, 15 ALR3d 887.

Discrimination on basis of illegitimacy as denial of constitutional rights, 38 ALR3d 613.

Right of putative father to custody of illegitimate child, 45 ALR3d 216.

Term “children” as used in beneficiary clause of life insurance policy as including illegitimate child, 62 ALR3d 1329.

Effect, in subsequent proceedings, of paternity findings or implications in divorce or annulment decree or in support or custody order made incidental thereto, 78 ALR3d 846.

Legitimation by marriage to natural father of child born during mother's marriage to another, 80 ALR3d 219.

Determination of paternity of child as within scope of proceeding under Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, 81 ALR3d 1175.

Validity and construction of surrogate parenting agreement, 77 ALR4th 70.

Rights of unwed father to obstruct adoption of his child by withholding consent, 61 ALR5th 151.

14 C.J.S. Children out of Wedlock § 1 et seq.

§ 14-2-401.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the Wyoming Parentage Act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referenced in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

De facto parentage not recognized. —

De facto parentage
was not recognized in Wyoming because the legislature (1) defined
the mother-child and father-child relationships, when adopting the
Wyoming Parentage Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-401

et seq., advisedly, (2) left no gap of sufficient size
to permit judicial adoption of the doctrine, and (3) acted extensively
to define the parent-child relationship and children's relationships
with those not their legal parents. LP v. LF, 2014 WY 152, 338 P.3d 908,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2014).

Parentage by estoppel not recognized. —

Parentage
by estoppel was not recognized in Wyoming because the legislature
(1) defined the mother-child and father-child relationships, when
adopting the Wyoming Parentage Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-401

et seq., advisedly, (2) left no gap of sufficient size
to permit judicial adoption of the doctrine, (3) acted extensively
to define the parent-child relationship and children's relationships
with those not their legal parents, and (4) created criteria for presumptive
parentage, preempting the field. LP v. LF, 2014 WY 152, 338 P.3d 908,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2014).

Cited

in

In re Paternity, JWH v. DAH, 2011 WY 66, 252 P.3d 942,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Apr. 14, 2011); IC v. DW, 2015 WY 135,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Oct. 7, 2015).

§ 14-2-402.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Acknowledged father” means a man who has established a father-child relationship under article 6 of this act;

“Adjudicated father” means a man who has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction to be the father of a child;

“Alleged father” means a man who alleges himself to be, or is alleged to be, the genetic father or a possible genetic father of a child, but whose paternity has not been determined. The term does not include:

A presumed father;

A man whose parental rights have been terminated or declared not to exist; or

A male donor.

“Assisted reproduction” means a method of causing pregnancy other than through sexual intercourse. The term includes:

Intrauterine insemination;

Donation of eggs;

Donation of embryos;

In-vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; and

Intracytoplasmic sperm injection.

“Child” means an individual of any age whose parentage may be determined under this act;

“Commence” means to file the initial pleading seeking an adjudication of parentage in a district court of this state;

“Determination of parentage” means the establishment of the parent-child relationship by the signing of a valid acknowledgment of paternity under article 5 of this act or by adjudication by the court;

“Donor” means an individual who produces eggs or sperm used for assisted reproduction, whether or not for consideration. The term does not include:

A husband who provides sperm, or a wife who provides eggs, to be used for assisted reproduction by the wife;

A woman who gives birth to a child by means of assisted reproduction;

A parent under article 9 of this chapter.

“Ethnic or racial group” means, for purposes of genetic testing, a recognized group that an individual identifies as all or part of the individual’s ancestry or that is so identified by other information;

“Genetic testing” means an analysis of genetic markers to exclude or identify a man as the father or a woman as the mother of a child. The term includes an analysis of one (1) or a combination of the following:

Deoxyribonucleic acid; and

Blood-group antigens, red-cell antigens, human-leukocyte antigens, serum enzymes, serum proteins or red-cell enzymes.

“Man” means a male individual of any age;

“Parent” means an individual who has established a parent-child relationship under W.S.

14-2-501

;

“Parent-child relationship” means the legal relationship between a child and a parent of the child. The term includes the mother-child relationship and the father-child relationship;

“Paternity index” means the likelihood of paternity calculated by computing the ratio between:

The likelihood that the tested man is the father, based on the genetic markers of the tested man, mother and child, conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested man is the father of the child; and

The likelihood that the tested man is not the father, based on the genetic markers of the tested man, mother and child, conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested man is not the father of the child and that the father is of the same ethnic or racial group as the tested man.

“Presumed father” means a man who, by operation of law under W.S.

14-2-504

, is recognized as the father of a child until that status is rebutted or confirmed in a judicial proceeding;

“Probability of paternity” means the measure, for the ethnic or racial group to which the alleged father belongs, of the probability that the man in question is the father of the child, compared with a random, unrelated man of the same ethnic or racial group, expressed as a percentage incorporating the paternity index and a prior probability;

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“Signatory” means an individual who authenticates a record and is bound by its terms;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Title IV-D” means Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act;

“This act” means W.S.

14-2-401

through

14-2-907

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-2-403.
Scope of act; choice of law.

This act applies to every determination of parentage in this state.

The court shall apply the law of this state to adjudicate the parent-child relationship. The applicable law does not depend on:

The place of birth of the child; or

The past or present residence of the child.

This act does not create, enlarge or diminish parental rights or duties under other law of this state.

This act does not authorize or prohibit an agreement between a woman and a man and another woman in which the woman relinquishes all rights as a parent of a child conceived by means of assisted reproduction, and which provides that the man and the other woman become the parents of the child. If a birth results under such an agreement and the agreement is unenforceable under Wyoming law, the parent-child relationship is determined as provided in article 4 of this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-404.
Court of this state.

The district court is authorized to adjudicate parentage under this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-405.
Protection of participants.

Proceedings under this act are subject to other law of this state governing the health, safety, privacy and liberty of a child or other individual who could be jeopardized by disclosure of identifying information, including address, telephone number, place of employment, social security number and the child’s day-care facility and school.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-406.
Determination of maternity.

Provisions of this act relating to determination of paternity apply to determinations of maternity.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-407.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this act or its application to an individual or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

§ 14-2-408.
Free transcript for appeal.

If a party is financially unable to pay the cost of a transcript, the court shall furnish on request a transcript for purposes of appeal under this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).